Utah statutes.
78B-6-1208.   Right of all parties may be determined.
The rights of all parties may be put in issue, tried, and determined by the
action.  If the court determines a sale of the premises is necessary, the
title shall be ascertained to the satisfaction of the court before the
judgment of sale can be made.  If service of the summons was made by
publication, similar proof is required concerning the rights of absent or
unknown parties before judgment is rendered.  If there are several unknown
persons having an interest in the property, their rights may be considered
together in the action.
